New York, session 2025-2026, A5088.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 70 of the state law, as amended by section 1 of 2 part U of chapter 58 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 70. Description of the arms of the state and the state flag. The 4 device of arms of this state is hereby declared to be correctly 5 described as follows: 6 Charge. Azure, in a landscape, the sun in fess, rising in splendor or, 7 behind a range of three mountains, the middle one the highest; in base a 8 ship and sloop under sail, passing and about to meet on a river, 9 bordered below by a grassy shore fringed with shrubs, all proper. 10 Crest. On a wreath azure and or, an American eagle proper, rising to 11 the dexter from a two-thirds of a globe terrestrial, showing the north 12 Atlantic ocean with outlines of its shores. 13 Supporters. On a quasi compartment formed by the extension of the 14 scroll. 15 Dexter. The figure of Liberty proper, her hair disheveled and deco- 16 rated with pearls, vested azure, sandaled gules, about the waist a cinc- 17 ture or, fringed gules, a mantle of the last depending from the shoul- 18 ders behind to the feet, in the dexter hand a staff ensigned with a 19 Phrygian cap or, the sinister arm embowed, the hand supporting the 20 shield at the dexter chief point, a royal crown by her sinister foot 21 dejected. 22 Sinister. The figure of Justice proper, her hair disheveled and deco- 23 rated with pearls, vested or, about the waist a cincture azure, fringed 24 gules, sandaled and mantled as Liberty, bound about the eyes with a 25 fillet proper, in the dexter hand a straight sword hilted or, erect, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01444-01-5 A. 5088 2 1 resting on the sinister chief point of the shield, the sinister arm 2 embowed, holding before her her scales proper. 3 Motto. On a scroll below the shield argent, in sable, [two lines. On 4 line one,] Excelsior [and on line two, E pluribus unum]. 5 State flag. The state flag is hereby declared to be blue, charged with 6 the arms of the state in the colors as described in the blazon of this 7 section. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. All arms of the state and 9 the state flags printed prior to the effective date need not be removed 10 or replaced.